Maine, session 132, LD680.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE MAINE
Maine Community College System - Board of Trustees 0556
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds to continue operations at the State's 7 community
colleges to support students' learning and completion for a credential of value.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,000,000 $6,300,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,000,000 $6,300,000